apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 2
	Entries: 5105
	Sdefs: 64
	Paradigms: 272

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ÀÁÂÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖØÙÚÛÜàáâäåæçèéêëìíîïñòóôöøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxiliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Lexical (normal) verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular and plural"/> 
    <sdef n="ut" 	c="Common gender"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Femininum"/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Maskulinum"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Maskulinum or femininum"/> 
    <sdef n="un" 	c="Common gender or neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="obj" 	c="Object"/> 
    <sdef n="subj" 	c="Subject"/> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="actv" 	c="Active voice"/> 
    <sdef n="pasv" 	c="Passive voice"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Past participle"/> 
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/> 
    <sdef n="past" 	c="Past (formerly 'da')"/> 
    <sdef n="supn" 	c="Supine"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperfect"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="pst" /> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="ssup" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="End of sentence"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
<!-- senere
  <e>       <re>[1-9]+([0-9]+)?(%)?</re><p><l>-årige</l><r>-årige<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[MCDXVLI]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
-->

</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Suffixes -->

<pardef n="S__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Determiners -->

<pardef n="e/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/en__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="varje__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mång/a__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="flera__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="flest__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mi/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="di/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="si/n__det">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vår/__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="er/__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="första__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="de/nna__det">
  <e>       <p><l>nna</l>       <r>nna<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tta</l>       <r>nna<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssa</l>       <r>nna<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="någ/on__det">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>on<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ra</l>        <r>on<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ing/en__det">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Pronouns -->

<e lm="en">              <i>e</i><par n="e/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="den">             <i>d</i><par n="d/en__det"/></e>
<e lm="varje">           <i>varje</i><par n="varje__det"/></e>
<e lm="många">           <i>mång</i><par n="mång/a__det"/></e>
<e lm="flera">           <i>flera</i><par n="flera__det"/></e>
<e lm="flest">           <i>flest</i><par n="flest__det"/></e>
<e lm="min">             <i>mi</i><par n="mi/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="din">             <i>di</i><par n="di/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="vår">             <i>vår</i><par n="vår/__det"/></e>
<e lm="er">              <i>er</i><par n="er/__det"/></e>
<e lm="sin">             <i>si</i><par n="si/n__det"/></e>
<e lm="första">          <i>första</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="andra">           <i>andra</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="tredje">          <i>tredje</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="fjärde">          <i>fjärde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="femte">           <i>femte</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sjätte">          <i>sjätte</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="sjunde">          <i>sjunde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="åttonde">         <i>åttonde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="nionde">          <i>nionde</i><par n="första__det"/></e>
<e lm="denna">           <i>de</i><par n="de/nna__det"/></e>
<e lm="ingen">           <i>ing</i><par n="ing/en__det"/></e>
<e lm="någon">           <i>någ</i><par n="någ/on__det"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
